apertium-es-ssp.ssp.dix
<pardef n="/ome-uma__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ome-uma</l> 
        <r>ome-uma<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>ome-uma</l> 
        <r>ome-uma<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ome-uma</l> 
        <r>ome-uma<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ome-uma</l> 
        <r>ome-uma<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ome-uma</l> 
        <r>ome-uma<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ome-uma</l> 
        <r>ome-uma<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ome-uma-ry</l> 
        <r>ome-uma<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ome-uma</l> 
        <r>ome-uma<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eylo-u-ry</l> 
        <r>ome-uma<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eylo-u</l> 
        <r>ome-uma<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>




    <pardef n="oämamals__ind">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sl:emamawab</l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
      </pardef>



<pardef n="ilemamupery__def">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ele__pos">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>  
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="2mamadohb__def">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>  
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="on__rel">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r>  
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="yiāgro__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="5__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>5</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="2__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>2</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="schomaze__pr">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="pr"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="y__cnjcoo">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l> 
        <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tan__preadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="preadv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="3__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>3</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="4__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>4</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="que__cnjsub">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="eimeacro-cre__cnjcoo">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="1__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>1</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="8__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>8</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="0__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>0</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="a__pr">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l> 
        <r><s n="pr"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="7__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>7</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="9__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>9</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="cert"><i>cert</i><par n="oämamals__ind"/></e>
<e lm="oämamals"><i>oämamals</i><par n="oämamals__ind"/></e>
<e lm="ele"><i>ele</i><par n="ele__pos"/></e>
<e lm="2mamadohb"><i>2mamadohb</i><par n="2mamadohb__def"/></e>
<e lm="ilemamupery"><i>ilemamupery</i><par n="ilemamupery__def"/></e>
<e lm="un"><i>un</i><par n="oämamals__ind"/></e>
<e lm="s:ymòmazy-faho"><i>s:ymòmazy-faho</i><par n="oämamals__ind"/></e>
<e lm="al fet que"><i>al<b/>fet<b/>que</i><par n="que__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="que"><i>que</i><par n="que__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="que"><i>que</i><par n="que__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="ym.ôcrozpb"><i>ym.ôcrozpb</i><par n="que__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="ch.eumimuzpu"><i>ch.eumimuzpu</i><par n="tan__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="tan"><i>tan</i><par n="tan__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="v.oäle"><i>v.oäle</i><par n="tan__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="com"><i>com</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="el qual"><i>el<b/>qual</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="el qual"><i>el<b/>qual</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="la qual cosa"><i>la<b/>qual<b/>cosa</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="on"><i>on</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="on"><i>on</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="s:abeimamull"><i>s:abeimamull</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="vm.òmacb"><i>vm.òmacb</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="qual"><i>qual</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="quan"><i>quan</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="quant"><i>quant</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="que"><i>que</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="que el seu"><i>que<b/>el<b/>seu</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="qui"><i>qui</i><par n="on__rel"/></e>
<e lm="Fma"><i>Fma</i><par n="eimeacro-cre__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="Odoheb"><i>Odoheb</i><par n="eimeacro-cre__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="eimemacro-cre"><i>eimemacro-cre</i><par n="eimeacro-cre__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="olemipib"><i>olemipib</i><par n="eimeacro-cre__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="s:omuma-umamu"><i>s:omuma-umamu</i><par n="eimeacro-cre__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="s:òamamupo"><i>s:òamamupo</i><par n="eimeacro-cre__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="s:òamamupo"><i>s:òamamupo</i><par n="eimeacro-cre__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="sinó"><i>sinó</i><par n="eimeacro-cre__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="y"><i>y</i><par n="y__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="sho:v.oämemaleb"><i>sho:v.oämemaleb</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="a__pr"/></e>
<e lm="a costa de"><i>a<b/>costa<b/>de</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="a la disposició de"><i>a<b/>la<b/>disposició<b/>de</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="abemamuwa"><i>abemamuwa</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="als peus de"><i>als<b/>peus<b/>de</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="ch.óacb emamudahb-n"><i>ch.óacb<b/>emamudahb-n</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="d'esquena a"><i>d'esquena<b/>a</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="emadohe"><i>emadohe</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="emamat"><i>emamat</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="en detriment de"><i>en<b/>detriment<b/>de</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="entre"><i>entre</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="f.oämawraiheb"><i>f.oämawraiheb</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="je sòamémaha:òamèmacb"><i>je<b/>sòamémaha:òamèmacb</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="malgrat"><i>malgrat</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="mitjançant"><i>mitjançant</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="olomemuwreihe-i"><i>olomemuwreihe-i</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="per a"><i>per<b/>a</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="referent a això"><i>referent<b/>a<b/>això</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="s:abômac"><i>s:abômac</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="s:ebömamu-abömama"><i>s:ebömamu-abömama</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="s:hm.õac"><i>s:hm.õac</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="s:omèmaldc"><i>s:omèmaldc</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="s:ömàfahe"><i>s:ömàfahe</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sch.aumac"><i>sch.aumac</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sch.õazpeb olamiwa"><i>sch.õazpeb<b/>olamiwa</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="schomaze"><i>schomaze</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="semaho:emec"><i>semaho:emec</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="semaho:emec"><i>semaho:emec</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="semaho:emecb"><i>semaho:emecb</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="semaho:emecb"><i>semaho:emecb</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="semaho:emecb"><i>semaho:emecb</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="semiha:emac"><i>semiha:emac</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sho:emac"><i>sho:emac</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sobre"><i>sobre</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sota"><i>sota</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="svc:yn.amàcb"><i>svc:yn.amàcb</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sòamehy:aumemucb"><i>sòamehy:aumemucb</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sòamémaha:amimyc"><i>sòamémaha:amimyc</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="sòamémuhu:òmèmuweu"><i>sòamémuhu:òmèmuweu</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="âemamapeb"><i>âemamapeb</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="òmamuwe"><i>òmamuwe</i><par n="schomaze__pr"/></e>
<e lm="emamufaho"><i>emamufaho</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sòamémuha:òac"><i>sòamémuha:òac</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ch.Fmacb"><i>ch.Fmacb</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="emimydohe"><i>emimydohe</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sõáméha:ôkub"><i>sõáméha:ôkub</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="emadahb"><i>emadahb</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="y.éázpugrol s:òmamupo"><i>y.éázpugrol<b/>s:òmamupo</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hm.amapo"><i>hm.amapo</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sòamehy:aumemucb"><i>sòamehy:aumemucb</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ebemiwraher"><i>ebemiwraher</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sòmemyhi:òamecb"><i>sòmemyhi:òamecb</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="Fma"><i>Fma</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="aemawraihobe ãemàlle"><i>aemawraihobe<b/>ãemàlle</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ch.émacb s:ememuzpa"><i>ch.émacb<b/>s:ememuzpa</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="aëmezpa-i"><i>aëmezpa-i</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="iãmamuzpb"><i>iãmamuzpb</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="s:ômic"><i>s:ômic</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="olamiwa"><i>olamiwa</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="olemumywrahe"><i>olemumywrahe</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="olóamawu-õamapib"><i>olóamawu-õamapib</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="r.amawob"><i>r.amawob</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="s:Fmap"><i>s:Fmap</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="s:eä mawe"><i>s:eä<b/>mawe</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="s:eämewraeheb"><i>s:eämewraeheb</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="s:omemaldb"><i>s:omemaldb</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="s:omemaldb emaudahb-n"><i>s:omemaldb<b/>emaudahb-n</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="s:omémawub"><i>s:omémawub</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="s:ômemapur-i"><i>s:ômemapur-i</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sahca:òamifaho"><i>sahca:òamifaho</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="scal:ómemufaho"><i>scal:ómemufaho</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="pnomàzuy"><i>pnomàzuy</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="semamaha:omemuqwreihob"><i>semamaha:omemuqwreihob</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sâeméce:âemeweyb"><i>sâeméce:âemeweyb</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sòameha:emumazpu"><i>sòameha:emumazpu</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sòamico:òamamazab"><i>sòamico:òamamazab</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sòamémaha:ömègrolzpe"><i>sòamémaha:ömègrolzpe</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="emamudahb-n"><i>emamudahb-n</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="vô-v.omamuwy"><i>vô-v.omamuwy</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ym.ômàzpub"><i>ym.ômàzpub</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ynomazuy"><i>ynomazuy</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="òmamuwe"><i>òmamuwe</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="ömamuwefahe"><i>ömamuwefahe</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
